Illinois, session 104th, HB530.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Budget Stabilization Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 122/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Budget Stabilization Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-660, eff. 7-1-04.)